Idaho, session 2026, H0865.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 61-207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-207. COMMISSIONERS AND EMPLOYEES -- OATH -- QUALIFICATIONS -- RE-
STRICTIONS ON POLITICAL ACTIVITY -- EX PARTE COMMUNICATIONS. (1) Each com-
missioner shall devote his entire time to the duties of his office and shall,
together with each person appointed to a civil executive office by the com-
mission, before entering upon the duties of his office, take and subscribe
to an oath to the effect that he will support the Constitution of the United
States and the state of Idaho, and faithfully and impartially discharge the
duties of his office as required by law and that he is not interested directly
or indirectly in any public utility embraced within the provisions of this
act; or any of its stocks, bonds, mortgages, securities or earnings.
(2) Each commissioner shall be a qualified elector of this state, and no
person while in the employ of or holding any official relation to any corpo-
ration or person, which said corporation or person is subject in whole or in
part to regulation by the commission, and no person owning stocks or bonds of
any such corporation or who is in any manner pecuniarily interested therein
shall be appointed to or hold the office of commissioner or be appointed or
employed by the commission: provided, that if such person shall become the
owner of such stocks or bonds or become pecuniarily interested in such corpo-
ration otherwise than voluntarily, he shall within a reasonable time divest
himself of such ownership or interest; failing to do so, his office or em-
ployment shall become vacant.
(3) No commissioner shall, directly or indirectly, while he is a member
of said commission, take any part in politics by advocating or opposing the
election, appointment or nomination of any person or persons to any office in
the state of Idaho, excepting under officers in the commission, nor shall any
commissioner seek appointment or election or nomination for any civil of-
fice in the state of Idaho, other than commissioner, while he is a member of
said commission, nor shall any commissioner seek appointment, nomination or
election to any civil office in the state of Idaho, other than that of commis-
sioner, for a period of two (2) years from the date of the expiration of his
term or after his resignation or removal from said office.


(4) The following provisions shall apply to any ex parte communications
directed to or originating from the commission, or any person employed by the
commission:
(a) No commissioner, or any person employed by the commission, shall,
directly or indirectly, solicit, invite, encourage, or consider any
communication from any person concerning the merits of any matter pend-
ing before the commission or reasonably expected to come before the
commission, unless such communication is made in the course of an offi-
cial proceeding or is reduced to writing and made a part of the records
of the commission.
(b) No public utility or agent thereof, party appearing before the
commission, lobbyist registered pursuant to chapter 7, title 74, Idaho
Code, representing a public utility, or attorney representing a public
utility shall, directly or indirectly, make any communication to any
commissioner, or any person employed by the commission, concerning the
merits of any matter pending before the commission or reasonably ex-
pected to come before the commission, unless such communication is made
in the course of an official proceeding or is reduced to writing and made
a part of the records of the commission.
(c) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to communications
limited solely to ministerial or scheduling matters or statements made
in a public hearing or other proceeding duly noticed by the commission.
(d) If any communication in violation of this subsection is received by
a commissioner, or any person employed by the commission, such commis-
sioner or employee receiving the communication shall create a written
summary of the communication and within seven (7) business days place
such summary in the records of the commission and transmit a copy of such
summary to any party before the commission who is adverse to the person
making such ex parte communication.
(e) Any person who violates any provision of this subsection shall
be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars
($250) if an individual and not to exceed two thousand five hundred dol-
lars ($2,500) if a person other than an individual. The burden of proof
for such civil liability shall be met by showing a preponderance of the
evidence. The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attor-
ney may prosecute any violations of this subsection. Prosecution for
a violation of this subsection shall be commenced within two (2) years
after the date on which the violation occurred. Venue for prosecution
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be in the county of
residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of the state of
Idaho, otherwise venue shall be in Ada county.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-1356, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-1356. GIFTS TO PUBLIC SERVANTS BY PERSONS SUBJECT TO THEIR JURIS-
DICTION. (1) Regulatory and law enforcement officials. No public servant in
any department or agency exercising regulatory functions, or conducting in-
spections or investigations, or carrying on civil or criminal litigation on
behalf of the government, or having custody of prisoners, shall solicit, ac-
cept or agree to accept any pecuniary benefit from a person known to be sub-


ject to such regulation, inspection, investigation or custody, or against
whom such litigation is known to be pending or contemplated.
(2) Officials concerned with government contracts and pecuniary trans-
actions. No public servant having any discretionary function to perform in
connection with contracts, purchases, payments, claims or other pecuniary
transactions of the government shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any
pecuniary benefit from any person known to be interested in or likely to be-
come interested in any such contract, purchase, payment, claim or transac-
tion.
(3) Judicial and administrative officials. No public servant having
judicial or administrative authority and no public servant employed by or in
a court or other tribunal having such authority, or participating in the en-
forcement of its decisions, shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any pe-
cuniary benefit from a person known to be interested in or likely to become
interested in any matter before such public servant or a tribunal with which
he is associated.
(4) Legislative and executive officials. No legislator or public ser-
vant shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any pecuniary benefit in return
for action on a bill, legislation, proceeding or official transaction from
any person known to be interested in a bill, legislation, official transac-
tion or proceeding.
(5) Exceptions. This section shall not apply to:
(a) fees prescribed by law to be received by a public servant, or any
other benefit for which the recipient gives legitimate consideration or
to which he is otherwise legally entitled; or
(b) gifts or other benefits conferred on account of kinship or other
personal, professional or business relationship independent of the of-
ficial status of the receiver; or
(c) trivial benefits not to exceed a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) in-
cidental to personal, professional or business contacts and involving
no substantial risk of undermining official impartiality; provided,
however, that for any commissioner or employee of the Idaho public util-
ities commission, such trivial benefits shall not exceed a value of
twenty dollars ($20.00); or
(d) benefits received as a result of lobbying activities that are dis-
closed in reports required by chapter 7, title 74, Idaho Code. This ex-
ception shall not apply to any activities prohibited by subsections (1)
through (4) of this section.
(6) Offering benefits prohibited. No person shall knowingly confer,
or offer or agree to confer, any benefit prohibited by the foregoing subsec-
tions.
(7) Grade of offense. An offense under this section is a misdemeanor
and shall be punished as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.